Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.050

Expanded function dental auxiliary—License.

(1) The commission shall issue a license to practice as an expanded function dental auxiliary to any applicant who:

(a) Pays any applicable fees as established by the secretary in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;

(b) Submits, on forms provided by the secretary, the applicant's name, address, and other applicable information as determined by the secretary; and

(c) Demonstrates that the following requirements have been met:

(i) Successful completion of a dental assisting education program approved by the commission. The program may be an approved online education program;

(ii) Successful completion of an expanded function dental auxiliary education program approved by the commission; and

(iii) Successful passage of both a written examination and a clinical examination in restorations approved by the commission.

(2)(a) An applicant that holds a limited license to practice dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW is considered to have met the dental assisting education program requirements of subsection (1)(c)(i) of this section.

(b) An applicant that holds a full license to practice dental hygiene under chapter 18.29 RCW is considered to have met the requirements of subsection (1)(c) of this section upon demonstrating the successful completion of training in taking final impressions as approved by the commission.

[ 2007 c 269 s 4.]